 "He added, 'We have a mouse that is currently being treated for diabetes that is four months old.'"
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical science division, warned that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the treatment of diabetes, and points out that these results are not relevant to type 1 diabetes patients.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy Nobel Prize literature committee secretary Sara Danius publicly announced that the committee had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan to deliver the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature news to him directly, as it was impossible to do so.
 "We're not doing anything right now," Danius said. "I called his closest collaborator and emailed him, and he was very kind and said that was enough for now."
 Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said he started the company when he couldn’t hear his shop’s doorbell in his garage.
 He said he created a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales increased after she appeared on the 2013 episode of Shark Tank, in which a startup turned down the show’s funding.
 In late 2017, Shiminoff appeared on the shopping television channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with rival security company ADT.
 While one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality, no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 The antibody cocktail ZMapp showed promise early on, but official studies have shown it to be less effective at preventing death than hoped.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation supports the USOC letter and recognizes the absolute need for Olympic officials to help ensure a safe environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that meaningful change can be made within the organization, rather than through withdrawal.
 The US Gymnastics Team supports an independent investigation into how the facts that Larry Nassar's victims have bravely spoken out about have not been brought to light for so long and what needs to be done to ensure that this never happens again.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal: to make the sport of gymnastics as safe as possible so that athletes can follow their dreams in a safe, positive and encouraging environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Brezinski served as an adviser to President Kennedy and then as a member of President Lyndon Johnson's administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 campaign and served as national security adviser from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As NSA, he assisted President Carter in dealing with world problems such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iran hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 Starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, the film was nominated for all major categories.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other categories include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing, and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Dreams of Fools" and "City of Stars," were nominated for Best Original Song. Liongate Studios received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 U.S. President Donald Trump said in a statement released by his spokesman late Sunday that U.S. troops would be withdrawn from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey also said it would protect captured ISIS fighters whom European countries refuse to repatriate.
 This not only confirms the widely held theory that some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides details that are usually lacking in fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists said the top of the feather was a dark brown, while the underside was pale or yellow.
 Such findings also provide insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Dinosaur feathers lack the well-developed vane called a barbule, but have other characteristic feather features, such as barbs and small filaments, and researchers have speculated that these other features may have evolved into barbules later.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation or display. Researchers examined samples from the tail of a young dinosaur and found that the feathers were not juvenile, but adult.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the sample shows that it is the feather of an adult, not a juvenile, the researchers say.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded in a police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 others.
 The governor said 19 of the wounded were police officers.
 Police said they are investigating the attack as an alleged act of the militant Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant (ISIL).
 They found that the sun works like the other stars, by emitting light and by rotating.
 It uses both the luminosity and the rotation to determine the star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 During the trip, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog in Tibet, almost married in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequency bands.
 If the base station has dual radios, this allows 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g to be backward compatible with older devices.
 802.11n theoretically has a maximum bandwidth of 600 Mbit/s, which is considerably faster than the previous standard.
 A married man with two adult children, Duval did not make a deep impression on Miller.
 When asked about the comments, Miller said, "I wasn't listening to what he was saying because I was preparing for my own remarks."
 "By 2020, we will make a significant reduction in the per capita emissions of carbon dioxide from the 2005 level," he said.
 He did not give a figure, saying the scale of the cuts would be based on China's economic output.
 "Hu urged developing countries to "break the old habit of polluting first and cleaning up later."
 "But that does not mean we should ask them to shoulder responsibilities beyond their stage of development and capabilities," he added.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12 p.m. GMT (Greenwich Mean Time) today.
 At this point, there is no guarantee that Iraq's actions will prevent sectarian warfare or an increase in violence, or that it will prevent chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open debate and consensus-building on U.S. policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 First, one of the 78 recommendations is that the new administration should adopt a new foreign policy by the end of this year to secure the border and re-establish diplomatic relations with neighboring countries in preparation for a hostile intervention in Iraq.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current senator and wife of Argentina's president, announced her candidacy for the presidency yesterday evening in La Plata, 50 kilometres from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for president in the same place where she began her campaign for the Senate in 2005, the Teatro Argentino.
 After Hurricane Katrina, there was controversy over the expenditure of relief and reconstruction funds, with those who favored a more fiscally conservative approach to the national budget calling it "Bush's New Orleans bargain".
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the so-called Washington insiders who got reconstruction contracts.
 More than 4 million people came to Rome for the funeral.
 The crowd was so large that most of them were not able to enter the funeral procession in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome so that people could watch the funeral.
 In many Italian cities and in other cities around the world, especially in Poland, similar screens have been installed so that many people can watch.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy cases, such as stolen vehicles, in order to artificially inflate its success rate.
 Congress has allocated funds for anti-obscenity measures since the 2005 budget, and the FBI has specified that it must have 10 agents dedicated to the adult pornography sector.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings best with 41 runs off 41 balls with 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid were in fine form and put on a 100-run partnership.
 However, after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings with 36 runs.
 President George W. Bush began a week-long tour of Asia on Monday morning, arriving in Singapore.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of midterm election defeats, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed Tuesday to send the government's "air pollution prevention act" to all party caucuses for review before a second reading, after a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 "Layton, in a meeting with the prime minister, asked for the Conservative Party's environmental legislation to be "re-written from scratch," and called for changes to the Conservative Party's environmental legislation."
 Since the federal government intervened to take over funding for the Mush hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state governments and some federal MPs have accused the move of being part of the federal election campaign in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard said the move was to prevent the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government, and he provided an additional $45 million.
 Recent reports indicate that sea level readings were taken at the time of the tsunami, and that the tsunami actually hit near Niue and Tonga.
 There were no reports of major damage or injuries in Tonga, but power supplies were temporarily disrupted and Tonga authorities were reportedly not notified of the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools on or near the coastline closed Wednesday, even though the alert was canceled.
 U.S. President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 "Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe said of the North's pledge, "It's a major step toward denuclearizing the Korean peninsula."
 The tenth hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed today in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Tropical Storm Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain per hour could cause the breached levee to fail.
 The Ninth Ward, which was hit by up to 20 feet of floodwater during Hurricane Katrina, is now being inundated by nearby levees.
 Water flows over the 100-foot-wide dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletions in a conversation with Wikinews last month.
 "He lied to us from the beginning, first saying it was all for legal reasons, and then acting like he was listening to us until the very end."
 Recent community backlash has led to efforts to create a policy proposal for sites containing millions of open licensed media that contain sexual content.
 Although mostly theoretical, the program is designed to simulate observations of the Hercules Galaxy Cluster.
 The effect the team was looking for could have been caused by the gravitational pull between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the halo.
 Just as the moon pulls on the Earth to create tides, the Milky Way pulls on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around the galaxy is located around the galaxy like a halo, and consists of a large amount of small particles.
 TV news shows white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors and not to drink tap water.
 According to Japan's nuclear regulatory agency, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that a container holding uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr. Tony Moll discovered XDR-TB (extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis) in the South African province of KwaZulu-Natal.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very lethal, very transmissible, and very scary."
 Dr. Moll believes some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of them were healthy hospital workers.
 In one year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the proportion of total TB patients with XDR-TB does not seem to be very high. At any given time, there are 330,000 TB patients in South Africa, and only about 6,000 of them have XDR-TB.
 Weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, the two satellites collided 491 miles above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion from the collision was huge.
 They are still studying the size of the collision and what effects it will have on Earth.
 The U.S. Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on a public website.
 The mother of a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh was found dead in the trunk of his car on Wednesday, and authorities in Ohio said they will charge him with aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malla R. Valsuva, 29, was found lying on the ground beside a road in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing only his T-shirt and underwear and under the influence of drugs.
 She pointed to her black Allsmobile Intraglide, 150 meters away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, wrapped in a blood-soaked blanket.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first outbreak of the season was reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs, and then by mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak has prompted the Indian government to send pig catchers to affected areas, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spray insecticide.
 The delivery of millions of polio vaccines, as promised by the government, will go a long way in helping health agencies prepare for the next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas of the world this year have been delayed due to a lack of funding and a lower priority than other diseases.
 Slaney emigrated to Sweden in 1956, and three years later he began working for the Swedish Postal Service, becoming its chief sculptor.
 He has produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 "His work is renowned for its high quality and detail, and he is one of the few ""household names"" in the stencil world. There are even people who collect his work exclusively. "
 His 1,000th tattoo was a monumental work by David Clough Erenshtein, 'The Achievements of the Kings of Sweden'.
 He has also been involved in the design of banknotes for other countries, most recently the new $5 and $10 Canadian banknotes, which feature his portrait on the front.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to the hospital but died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the crash.
 The vehicle was moved from the crash site at approximately 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 "One man who works at a garage near the crash site said: 'The children who were waiting to cross the road were all screaming and crying.'"
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to complete the funding for helping countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go toward flood-resistant housing, water resource management, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to dismiss women's health concerns as a fad have backfired.
 She came to this conclusion because she was inundated with positive comments and encouragement from women and men alike who insisted that contraception should be considered a medically necessary thing.
 After the wounded were taken to the hospital and the fighting stopped, about 40 inmates remained in the prison yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to get the situation under control, but the demands of the prisoners were unclear.
 Between 10 and 11 p.m. MDT (mountain daylight time), inmates started fires in the prison yard.
 Soon, police with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to corner the inmates.
 Firefighters finally extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal flooding that deposited sediment throughout the river was reduced.
 These deposits are essential to the formation of sandbars and beaches that are used as wildlife habitats.
 As a result, two species of fish became extinct, and two others, including the humpback whale, became endangered.
 The flood will raise the water level by a few feet, but officials are hoping that the sandbars eroded by the flood will recover.
 No tsunami warning was issued and the Indonesian Geophysics Agency said that a quake of magnitude 6.5 or less would not trigger a tsunami warning.
 Despite the absence of any tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Though Winfrey shed tears in her farewell speech, she promised her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not goodbye. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of a new one."
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections show that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), also retained a majority in the parliamentary election.
 The coalition and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, and other coalition aircraft were also dispatched to provide support.
 The collision occurred at a high elevation in mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 Medical charities, Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organization, say this outbreak is the worst the country has seen.
 "Angola is in the worst situation and the situation in Angola is still very bad," said MSF spokesperson Richard Veerman.
 The match started at 10 a.m. in good weather, and was perfect for the seven-nation rugby tournament, except for a light drizzle in the morning that soon stopped.
 The top seeded South Africa, who were drawn in Group A, made a flying start with a 26-0 win over Zambia, the fifth seeds.
 In the matches against the southern nations, South Africa was completely rusty, but as the tournament progressed, they improved steadily.
 Their well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and great teamwork made them stand out and it was obvious that the team would win.
 Amsterdam city officials and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with fungus and is a public health hazard.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday but a court order halted the demolition.
 "All caves with the name "Seven Sisters" have entrances at least 100 to 250 metres (328 to 820 ft) in diameter."
 Infrared images show that the cave is likely to be a daytime and nighttime temperature change.
 "They are cooler during the day and warmer at night than the surrounding surface."
 "These thermal behaviors are not as stable as a large cavern on Earth that maintains a constant temperature, but they match the deep hole on the surface," said Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University.
 Voting in France is traditionally a low-key experience: voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed paper ballots into envelopes.
 After the staff verify the voter's identity, the voter places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the poll book.
 French electoral law is rather strict in its procedures.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has been made transparent so that voters and observers can see that it contains only one ballot, properly counted and from a registered voter, and no other envelopes.
 Candidates may send representatives to observe the entire election process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision, according to a specific procedure.
 Previously launched globally for cost-saving and functional reasons, ASUS Eee PC was the talk of the town at Taipei IT Month 2007.
 But since ASUS won the 2007 Taiwan Sustainability Award from Taiwan's Executive Yuan Minister Yeh, the consumer market for notebook computers has been rapidly diversifying and changing.
 The station's website describes the show as "a fresh, irreverent, traditional radio theatre."
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet Radio, a site that focused on talk radio and long-term Internet radio.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary broadcasting station.
 The show originally featured local amateurs from East Texas.
 With no law enforcement officers in sight in the city of Bishkek, widespread looting continued overnight.
 "One eyewitness described the situation in Bishkek as 'lawless' as people roamed the streets in groups and looted shops."
 Some residents of Bishkek have blamed the illegal actions of the southern protesters.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match against the All Blacks (New Zealand) at the South Africa Loftus Versfeld Stadium in Pretoria.
 The final score was 21-20, with the All Blacks winning the match and ending their 15-game winning streak.
 The Springboks have lost five games in a row.
 It was the final of the All Blacks' already trophy-laden two-week tour.
 The final match of the series will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks take on Australia.
 The tornado hit western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 The US Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center said there were no immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 A dead wild duck infected with the H5N1 strain of the bird flu virus, which is fatal to humans, was found in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France on Monday.
 France is the seventh country in Europe to be affected by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of being H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 "Chambers has sued God for 'millions of deaths, destruction and millions of terrorist attacks' inflicted on the Earth's population."
 "The atheist Chambers claimed that his lawsuit was 'frivolous' and that 'anyone can sue anyone.'"
 "The story Camille Saint-Saens presented in the French opera is the story of an artist who "lived under the domination of love for drugs and Japan."
 As a result, performers on stage are smoking marijuana cigarettes and the theater itself is encouraging the audience to participate.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were in fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but he was harsher in his words for Romney, who had run a negative campaign against Gingrich in Iowa.
 "Perry said he would return to Texas to assess the results of the leadership meeting and decide whether there was a path forward for him in the race," but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 After winning the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann suspended her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, but later died there.
 "According to what is known, he is in his 20s. In a statement, Beaver said, "Although I was not at the scene of the tragic incident and I have no direct connection, I send my condolences and prayers to the families of the victims."
 TMZ, a celebrity news website, admitted that the photographer had parked his car across the street from Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take pictures of the police station before crossing the street, and that the California Highway Patrol had twice ordered him to back off.
 Police said the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 Because only 18 medals are awarded each day, many countries did not get to the medal podium.
 Yesterday's Super-G included 9th place for Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands in the women's standing class, and 10th place for Katja Saarinen of Finland in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Golia finished 11th in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Zelynek finished 16th in the men's sitting super-G.
 Mexican wrestler Ali Velasquez finished 15th in men's super heavyweight freestyle. New Zealand wrestler Adam Hall finished ninth in men's super heavyweight freestyle.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super G. South Korea's Park Jongsuk finished 24th in the men's standing Super G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are being blamed for a disease outbreak that started near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, the UN camp failed to properly disinfect waste, causing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the army came, Haiti had never had a problem with disease since 1800.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti cited independent research that the UN peacekeepers in Nepal inadvertently spread the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantau, a UN disease expert, said the rapid increase was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr. Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted a patient in stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak has occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in a variety of jobs on several different shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped produce The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 He left the pro circuit in 1993, but he retained the title of production director and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties every season.
 Earlier, China's Xinhua news agency reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 The plane was reportedly returning to Afghanistan after receiving a bomb threat, and landed in Kandahar.
 Initial reports said the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after refusing to make an emergency landing in Yermenky.
 Aircraft accidents are common in Iran, both civilian and military, due to the poor maintenance of aging aircraft.
 International sanctions meant that new aircraft could not be purchased.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three and injuring three.
 Last month, an Iranian plane crashed on its way to Armenia, killing 168 people, the worst aviation disaster in years.
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed off the runway at Mashad Airport, killing 17 people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the remaining shows on its tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler fell from the stage during a performance on August 5, the tour was cancelled.
 Murray broke the deadlock in the first set after the two men had each served out a game.
 Del Potro took the first set, but after 6-6, he needed a tie-break again.
 Portis was treated for shoulder injuries at the time, but was able to return to the game.
 The program started at 8:30 p.m. local time (15.00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country sang the religious hymn, bhajan, in front of Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Sanjay Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Chowdhury. Chhappan bhog Vajan also performed. Singer Raju Khandelwal was there with him.
 And Laca Sing led the way in singing the Bajan songs.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (a Hindu offering of 56 different foods, fruits, nuts, and dishes) were prepared for Baba Shyam.
 Laka Sing also featured Chappan Bhog Bajan. The singer Raju Kandel sang with Laka Sing.
 At the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the company's new Nintendo Revolution game console.
 Similar to a television remote control, the controller uses two sensors located near the user to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to move the device through the air to control movement and motion.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car early in the race and had to retire.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had a bad front wheel spin and had to retire soon after the pit stop.
 Michael Schumacher was beaten to the finish line by Alonso by a tiny margin, due to suspension damage caused by numerous collisions during the race.
 "According to the transcript of the press conference, Zhang said, 'She is very cute and sings quite well.'"
 "I was deeply moved every time I rehearsed this work."
 About three minutes after launch, a very large amount of insulating foam was seen falling away from the fuel tank, as seen on onboard cameras.
 However, they are not thought to have caused the damage to the space shuttle.
 "NASA's space shuttle program manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam insulation fell off "after the period of concern."
 After about five minutes of fireworks, the wind started to blow. Then, after about a minute, the wind was blowing at 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but the rain was so big that it felt like needles were stabbing my skin. Then hail started to fall. People were screaming and running around. It was chaos.
 "I lost my brother and his friend, I saw two disabled people in wheelchairs on the way, and I saw people pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. said there was no impact from the quake, and that the No. 1 and 2 reactors at the Shika nuclear power plant were halted.
 The 9,400 households in the area reportedly live without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and train service was suspended in the affected areas, while Ishikawa Airport in Noto was closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Two more bombs exploded near the government building two hours later.
 According to some reports, the official death toll was eight, while the official report said up to 30 people were injured.
 After eating contaminated pet food, dogs and cats were found to have both cyanuric acid and melamine in their urine samples.
 The researchers said the two compounds react with each other to form crystals, which can block the kidneys' function.
 The researchers observed the formation of crystals in the cat's urine with the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals matches the crystals found in the urine of affected animals when compared to infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 As you may know, most of the goods from Central America enter the country duty-free.
 Although fifty percent of our goods are taxed through customs in Central American countries, we treat you.
 That just didn't seem right to me. It wasn't fair.
 I say to you, as you do to us, so shall it be done to you.
 California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 "This bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a '18' rating and imposes a $1,000 fine for selling these games to minors."
 The Attorney General, Keir Starmer QC, announced this morning that both Huhne and Pryce will be charged.
 Hoon resigned and was replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey MP, who was budgeted to take over the Department of Business from Davey.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were identified as Nicholas O'Donnell, 25, and Zachary Cudback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arms and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider suffered facial injuries that required reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon missed the fifth man's head. Schneider suffered constant pain, went blind in one eye, lost part of his skull, and had his face reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home at the USAF base.
 Carpanedo competed in two individual races in addition to the Wednesday event, the championship.
 Her first race was a slalom, in which she failed to make the finals in the first run. Of the 116 competitors, 36 had the same result.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she finished 10th with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 behind the winner, Austria's Claudia Rieser, and 1:09.20 behind Hungary's Gundi Daniel.
 Four female skiers who were seated in the women's section did not make it to the finish line, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the competition were eliminated from the race.
 The Madia Pradesh police recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 "D K Arya Deputy Commissioner of Police said, "Five persons who raped a Swiss woman have been arrested and also recovered the victim's mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrashekhar Solanki, the police chief, said the defendant had come to court with his face covered.
 Three people were in the car when it crashed into the house, but no one was injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road was temporarily closed and emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first admitted to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then relocated to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is charged with murdering his son in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is awaiting indictment and trial in custody, but because of her notoriety, witness testimony may be biased.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish law is different and the court considered publication of the photographs to be a potential harm.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at Dundee University, said: "If journalists publish pictures of suspects, they are walking a tightrope.
 The Crown Office, which deals with overall prosecutions, has suggested to journalists that there will be no further comment until at least after the trial.
 According to the leaked document, the map is based on the 1967 borders of the Middle East and is likely to be related to the border dispute that Palestinians want.
 According to reports, other topics include the future of the holy city of Jerusalem for both countries and the issue of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demanded that the current troops in the area stay for 10 years, and the PA agreed that the troops would leave after five years.
 Hunters participating in the additional pest control trials were closely supervised by forestry officers because they were monitoring the trials and assessing their effectiveness.
 The partnership between the NPWS and the Australian Sporting Shooters Association saw the recruitment of qualified volunteers to assist with the Sporting Shooters Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mike O'Flaherty, acting director of Park Conservation and Heritage at NPWS, the four marksmen selected for the first shooting operation were all given comprehensive safety and training guidance.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday for the nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 This is Matelie's fifth CEP in four years.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP as part of measures to prepare for new elections.
 In response to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October, a commission was established in October.
 Some of the violent resistance was because some elections have not been held since 2011.
 Approximately 60 incidents of iPod overheating have been reported, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had identified 27 accidents involving the equipment.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that it had received 34 additional reports of overheating incidents that Apple had deemed "not serious."
 "The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was "deeply regrettable" that Apple had postponed the release of its report.
 The quake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT).
 The Northern Mariana Office of Homeland Security said no damage was reported nationwide.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino police officer hijacked a bus in the Philippine capital of Manila and took tourists from Hong Kong hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were freed and at least six people were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were freed early, along with Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an elderly woman needed to use the bathroom, the photographers took her place. Mendoza was shot.
 Lygins followed in his father's footsteps and went into medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Donghan Riggs, who works in a hospital, began to study about premature labor in his spare time.
 His research showed that when hormones were administered, the rate of lung maturation in the fetus increased.
 Xinhua News Agency reported that government investigators retrieved two black boxes from the plane on Wednesday.
 Other wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tammy Drymer said, "Luna was the Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Luna left us on a full moon night. She was so special, just like her. She was a strong woman."
 "Dustin 'Goldie' Runnels said, 'Luna was as weird as me... maybe even weirder... I love her and I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place.'"
 A 2010 poll of 1,400 people conducted for the federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 During the 2010 federal election campaign, Prime Minister Julia Gillard argued that Australia should become a republic when Queen Elizabeth II's reign ends.
 In a poll, 34 percent said they wanted Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 In a poll, 29 percent of respondents said Australia should become a republic quickly, while 31 percent said it should not.
 The Olympic gold medalist was scheduled to compete in the 100m freestyle and 200m freestyle and the relay of the Commonwealth Games, but his poor health was suspected due to illness.
 The medicines needed to overcome the pain were banned in the competition, so I couldn't take them.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri State University, has discovered the largest known prime number as of January 25.
 Several people have been using various hardware and software to prove the discovery since early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been the source of water on Earth, along with the organic materials that make up proteins and sustain life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, because a comet collided with the Earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 "He called the rumors 'political gossip and nonsense.'"
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that will allow aircraft to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 This allows air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with much greater accuracy than was previously possible using ground-based radar technology, and provides pilots with more accurate information.
 At Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface trains stopping, and no on-site parking or public transport interchange.
 Concerns over lack of public transportation have made it likely that the game will be played behind closed doors.
 A study published in the journal Science last Thursday announced that a new species of bird has formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Although the researchers from Princeton University and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species evolved in just two generations, it is thought that this process would have taken much longer because of the hybridization between the local species, the Darwin finch, the intermediate ground finch and the introduced cactus finch, and the large cactus finch.
 Gold can be worked into all kinds of shapes. It can be rolled into very small shapes.
 It can be cut with a thin line, it can be bent or twisted. It can be beaten with a hammer or rolled into a sheet.
 "Gold can be made very thin and can be bonded to other metals. It is so thin that it was used to decorate the hand-painted books called "illuminated manuscripts."
 This is called the pH of the chemical, and can be measured using a red cabbage indicator.
 Carrot juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline (basic) the chemicals are.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions (H in pH) in a tested chemical.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost an electron. (Hydrogen atoms are made of one proton and one electron.)
 Dry the two powders together, then put them into the ball with a clean hand wet with water.
 The moisture in your hands reacts with the outer layer to give a fun texture and forms a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had elaborate sewage systems and flush toilets connected to almost every house.
 Remains of sewage systems have been found in the houses of the Minoan cities of Santorini and Crete.
 Toilets have existed since ancient times in Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman Empire, the toilet was sometimes part of a public bathing area where men and women used the same facilities.
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 Satellites in space receive the signal and reflect it back almost immediately.
 Satellites are launched into space with rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 To put a satellite or telescope into space, you need a huge rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the most obvious being that it has given us a more convenient and faster means of transportation.
 It brought trains and cars and many other forms of transportation.
 Below them are medium-sized animals such as rabbits, deer, and moose, and medium-sized carnivores that hunt them.
 Finally, there are many more small cats (including stray house cats) that eat much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their success is based on the concept of each cat's specialty, which prevents competition with other cats, and exploiting a niche.
 Lions are the most social of the cat family.
 A herd consists of 1 to 3 adult males, 30 or more females and their young.
 Females are closely related to each other because they are mostly sisters and daughters in large families.
 Lion prides behave in a way that is remarkably similar to that of a pride of lions (but different from other large carnivores), which is also highly lethal to prey.
 Tigers are like versatile athletes, able to climb, swim, leap long distances, and run five times as fast as a human.
 Tigers are a social animal, living in groups of up to four animals, which include lions, leopards and jaguars. Only these four animals roar.
 The roar of a tiger is different from the roar of a lion, but it is similar to the phrase of a word that is roaring and shouting.
 Ocelots enjoy eating small animals, and if possible, they hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds that are much smaller than they are.
 Scientists think that the otter uses its sense of smell to track and find its prey.
 Ocelots are nocturnal, so they can see well in the dark, and they can move very stealthily. Ocelots hunt their prey by sneaking up on it and pouncing on it from above.
 When a small group of organisms is separated from the main group from which it originated (by moving to a mountain or river, or by being stranded on a new island), they often realize that they are in a different environment from the one they were in before.
 In this new environment, with different resources and competitors, the new populations need different characteristics or adaptations to be competitive.
 The original population had not changed at all, but they still need to adapt as before.
 As time went on and new people began to adapt to their new environment, they began to look more and more like the others.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two groups will look so different that they can no longer be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence of evolution and is an important part of it every week.
 Plants make the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants use photosynthesis to make their own food and also provide shade.
 We build houses of wood and make clothes of plants. Most of the food we eat is vegetable. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 Mosasaurus was the top predator of its time, so there was nothing to fear except other mosasaurs.
 The huge jaw was filled with more than 70 very sharp teeth, and there were additional teeth in the roof of the mouth, meaning that no one could get past it.
 It is not certain, but it may have had a split tongue. It ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have eaten human flesh.
 This animal attacked anything that came into the water, even huge dinosaurs like the Tyrannosaurus.
 Their food was generally familiar to us, but among the Roman people's banqueting materials were also unusual and strange things like pigs, peacocks, snails, and hibernating mice.
 Another difference is that the poor sat on chairs and ate, while the rich men preferred to recline on couches and eat together.
 Ancient Roman meals would not have included food that came from the United States or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they didn’t eat corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a ziggurat for each of their gods, which they believed to be the "house of the god."
 People would bring offerings to the gods, and priests would try to appease the gods through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctum, which was accessible only to the priests.
 Sometimes special pyramid-shaped towers called ziggurats were built to be part of the temple.
 The top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely out of doors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were just stalls on the street, and stones were used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In the Norwegian Saga, they say that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, and when he sailed further west, he discovered Greenland and named it Greenland.
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimos were already living there at the time.
 Although the countries were united under the name "Scandinavia", there were many differences between the peoples of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland, as well as their kings, customs, and histories.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence is a treasure map.
 But that's not true. Even if there's something written on the back of the paper, it's not a treasure map.
 "The back of the Declaration of Independence has the words 'Original Declaration of Independence July 4th, 1776' written on it, upside down and backwards."
 No one knows who wrote it, but the large parchment document (75.6 cm x 62.2 cm) was rolled up and stored away early on.
 So it's likely that it was simply labeled.
 The D-Day landings and the subsequent battle liberated northern France, but the south remained free.
 "It was under the rule of Vichy France, which was the French people who chose to ally with Germany in 1940 and were collaborators rather than resistors."
 "On 15 August 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, which was called Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces liberated southern France and were heading for Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people who work and live together, a single culture shared by a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, meaning citizen, from civis, meaning citizen, and from civitas, meaning city or city-state.
 The urban states can be considered the pioneers of civilization, and the culture of civilization means the transmission of knowledge over generations, the survival of cultural traces, and the equitable distribution of goods.
 Many cultures have left no meaningful historical evidence and are not treated as proper civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen colonies formed a loose confederation under the Articles of Confederation, which gave each state a veto over the central government's power.
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and no national executive or judicial branch, so it often had to rely on cooperative state authorities to enforce laws.
 Congress also had no power to nullify state laws or tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous consent of all states, and most state representatives, who ignored the central government, boycotted the meetings.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful national team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the north, and Italian athletes sometimes compete in international events or the Olympics.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island in the world!
 "Japan's cluster of islands/archipelago is often called the ""island chain"" because of its geographical position."
 Taiwan began as a beautiful island called Ilha Formosa by Portuguese sailors in the 16th century.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, and began to introduce changes in the methods of grain production, and to employ Chinese laborers to produce rice and sugar through re-farming.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) conquered the western and northern coastal regions of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a part of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan and gave the island to Japan until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures, the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge have been reconstructed to allow tourists to better understand the original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu was restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35 mm, which was the film size used primarily at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still in production today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been carried over into the digital camera's image sensor format.
 It's a bit confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (the simplest integer ratio to get) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (e.g., APS format) are the same or nearly the same aspect ratio.
 The much-abused and often mocked rule of thirds is a simple guideline for maintaining the order of an image while creating dynamism.
 This rule states that the most effective position to locate the main subject is where the vertical and horizontal lines of the image intersect (see example).
 During this period of European history, the wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was thoroughly investigated.
 Over a period of more than a thousand years, Christianity united the European nations in spite of their differences in language and customs.
 Its pervasive power affects everyone from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the Church's currency fund exists for that reason in particular.
 The church's central power remained in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and wealth raised questions about the legitimacy of the doctrine.
 Immediately after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although these blockades violated international law, which is generally accepted by several international conventions of the last two centuries, the strategy proved effective in blocking important military and civilian supplies.
 The British had mined the high seas to prevent any ship from entering any of the maritime zones, putting neutral ships at risk as well.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response in an unrestricted submarine war.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing mood among most citizens and most nations was pacifism and isolationism.
 The nations that had suffered the horrors of the First World War prayed that they would never again have to endure such a situation.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 He (the former manager of his company) brought a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, a copy of the book Thomas Edison had written, and four cents, all of his worldly possessions.
 In ancient China, there were different ways to indicate different eras, and each era or dynasty was distinguished by the family that held power.
 There were also periods of instability between the various dynasties, the best known being the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During this period, there was a bitter war between many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people fighting to sit in the highest seats of the Xian palace.
 The use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, the rise of nationalism and the idea that the nation is the property of the people rather than of a single ruler, all had a great impact on society and politics.
 Also, after the revolution, jobs were open to all male applicants, opening the way for the most ambitious and success-oriented people to succeed.
 Because of the current ability-based ranking system, the same system is used in the military.
 The French Revolution also inspired workers in other countries to rise up against their oppressors.
 Muhammad was deeply concerned with issues that transcended this worldly life. He often used a cave known as Hira on Mount Noor (Light) for meditation.
 The cave, which has withstood the test of time, reveals Muhammad’s religious inclinations very clearly.
 Perched on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, this cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's not easy to find. Once you're inside the cave, you're completely isolated.
 The only thing you can see from the cave is the clear blue sky above the mountains.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is one of the seven wonders of the world that still exist today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century BC, the Great Pyramid was one of many huge pyramid structures built to house the dead pharaohs.
 "The Giza Plateau, or Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian desert, contains several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller pyramids, several temples, and the Sphinx."
 The pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu and smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wife and family.
 The "upstroke" mark is V-shaped, and the "downstroke" mark is like a rectangle without a staple or bottom line.
 Drawing is starting from the end of the bow, and releasing is starting from the bowstring (the part that holds the bow).
 The bow usually makes a softer sound, while the string makes a louder, more confident sound.
 You can draw your own markings with a pencil, but the bow markings are for the purpose of the music competition, so they should be kept.
 The terrified French King Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles) and the King's sister, Princess Elizabeth, were forced to flee Versailles for Paris on 6 October 1789 by a crowd of women.
 The king and queen returned to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a crowd that shouted and threatened them.
 The crowds forced the king and queen to open their carriage windows.
 At one point, a member of the mob waved the head of a royal guard who had been killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The cost of the U.S. imperialist war to conquer the Philippines was paid for by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial government to pay for a large part of their expenses, and bonds in the name of the Philippine government were attracting interest through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the super-profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute the basic profit of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must know the background to the creation of the order.
 The period in which the events took place is usually referred to as the High Middle Ages, which corresponds to the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000-1300 AD) in European history.
 The late Middle Ages, which preceded the early modern period, is usually considered to end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a broadly held philosophical concept that encompasses a variety of substantive views, ranging from the technologically oriented or technological imperative to the more precise meaning that human destiny is driven by fundamental logic related to science and technology.
 "Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts: that technological development itself has an influence beyond culture or politics, and that technology is not socially controlled but rather has an "impact" on society that is intrinsic to it."
 For example, someone might argue that cars have led to the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is not economically viable for a few cars alone, so new production methods are developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Also, as more people own vehicles, the number of road accidents increases, which in turn leads to new technological advances in the medical field to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of cultural determinism, influenced by writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schelling.
 From a romantic point of view, geography shaped individuals, and as time passed, the customs and cultures related to that geography grew, which was socially harmonious, and in the end, it was better than arbitrarily imposing laws.
 While Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 The reputation of the city as a centre of luxury began in about 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 In the 12th century, Constantinople's prestige was on the wane, mainly because the Crusaders returned with gifts such as silks and spices that were more valuable than the goods sold in the Byzantine market.
 At this time, the fashion capital was changed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and in the 14th century.
 In the early days, dress was greatly influenced by Byzantine culture in the East.
 However, because the exchange of information was slow, the Western style could be 25-30 years behind.
 Late medieval Europe began to develop its own styles. One of the greatest developments of the time was that people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes, as a result of the Crusades.
 Subsistence farming is farming that is carried out by farming specialists and their families to produce only as much food as they need.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, organic system that uses locally adapted seeds through crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize harvests.
 Historically, most farmers have been subsistence farmers and this is still true in many developing countries.
 Subcultures allow people who feel marginalized by society to form their own identities.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location and/or gender of the members.
 The defining characteristics of a subculture are linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, and geographic, and may include any combination of these.
 Members of subcultures often express their sense of belonging through unique and symbolic styles that include fashion, mannerisms, and specific slang.
 One of the most common ways of demonstrating the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, for reasons of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called "feral children". Some feral children are confined, often by their parents, who are unable to accept their child's severe intellectual or physical disabilities.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are claimed to have been raised by animals, and some children claim to have lived in the wild themselves.
 When raised entirely by nonhuman animals, wild infants behave like animals that require almost exclusive care, such as fear or indifference to humans.
 Project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and scaffolding takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is more like a helper than a method of learning. It helps people who are learning something new, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 A scaffold can be both virtual and real, in other words, the teacher is a form of scaffolding, but the little paper clip man in Microsoft Office could be too.
 Virtual structures are built into the software and are designed to prompt, prompt, and explain procedures that students might find difficult to handle on their own.
 The reasons for a child being placed in foster care are wide-ranging, from neglect to abuse, even to theft.
 All children should be raised in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment, but that is not the case.
 We consider the foster care system as a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a caring caregiver, a stable education, and reliable medical care.
 Foster care must be able to provide all the essential elements that were not met in the original home.
 The Internet has both a collective communication and a person-to-person communication element.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of access and satisfaction.
 "For example, "learning" and "socialization" have been suggested as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 In their study of viewer response to websites, Ajram and MacCord (1998) identified "personal involvement" and "continuing relationships" as new motivational aspects.
 By using video recording, we were able to make important discoveries in the interpretation of subtle facial expressions and movements that lasted only a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it claims to be able to accurately interpret subtle facial expressions to determine whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks has shown in his book, "The President's Speech," that people accurately perceived the sincerity of a person who was unable to speak because of brain damage.
 He even suggested that these abilities to analyze human behavior are also possessed by animals like pets.
 Research in the 20th century has shown that there are two hidden or apparent genetic variants.
 Mutations create new species genes, and selection removes the expressed genes from the pool.
 Separation and recombination shuffles the mutations that occur in each generation between the two gene pools.
 In the savannah, primates with human-like digestive systems have a hard time getting the amino acids they need from the available plant resources.
 In addition, the failure of this process leads to serious consequences - a decrease in growth function, malnutrition, and eventually death.
 The most readily available plant-based resources are the proteins from leaves or legumes, but these are difficult for us primates to digest without cooking.
 In contrast, animal foods like ants and termites, and eggs, are not only easily digested, but also provide high-quality proteins containing essential amino acids.
 "Given all the circumstances, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the 'protein problem' in much the same way as the chimpanzees of today do in the savannah."
 Sleep disruption is a process of deliberately waking up during a normal sleep period and then falling asleep again after a short period of time (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up without fully rousing you.
 If you turn off your alarm clock while you are asleep, you can put the clock in a far corner of the room so that you will have to get up and turn it off yourself.
 Other biological rhythm-based options include consuming large amounts of fluid (especially water or diuretics, which are well known for helping to force urination) before bedtime.
 The amount of equanimity a person has is related to the amount of insecurity that is embedded in his body and mind.
 The less you worry, the more positive energy you will have in your life. Everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and satisfaction.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment; the only obstacle to this goal is our inner anxiety and negative attitudes.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been expanded upon with many ideas of Mahayana Buddhism and many techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism is very simple in theory: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that embraces all.
 When you practice Kundalini yoga, you awaken the Kundalini energy through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualization.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and create enlightening rituals.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy, and this led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. The clash of systems, changes, and cultures that followed the end of the war led to the decline of many nations.
 Two years later, the former allies became enemies and the Cold War began.
 The Cold War would last for the next 40 years and become a real fight by proxy armies in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defences had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat along the Romanian bridgehead and regroup.
 However, these plans became obsolete when more than 800,000 Soviet soldiers invaded eastern Poland in violation of the Pact of Non-Aggression between the Soviet Union and Poland and other international treaties (bilateral and multilateral) and entered the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts.
 Shipping goods by sea is the most efficient way to move large amounts of people and goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission is traditionally to transport people and goods well, but also to prevent the enemy from doing the same.
 One of the most notable recent examples was the North Atlantic Campaign of World War II. The Americans tried to move men and resources across the Atlantic to help the British.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which used U-boats, tried to stop this traffic.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would have been able to conquer Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goat farming is believed to have begun in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them for easy access to milk, wool, meat, and leather.
 Cattle are usually kept in herds on hillsides or in pastures, often under the care of a herdsman, usually a child or adolescent, who is known as a kokotxa. This method of herding is still used today.
 The Machu Picchu road was built in the early 16th century.
 The macadam road was made of parallel wooden planks, but it allowed horses to travel faster and carry more than the rougher roads of the time.
 Sleepers were introduced quite early to fix the track. However, it was gradually found that railways on iron sleepers were more efficient.
 This became a common practice, but iron made the wooden wheels of the wagons wear out more quickly.
 As time went on, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels, and in 1767, the first railroad was finally introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking, and 2 million years ago, Homo erectus appeared, and human beings began to walk upright.
 Their ancestor, Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal 7 million years ago, but the best evidence of bipedalism comes from Australopithecus, which appeared 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly lives, join environmental movements, and even become activists to reduce the suffering we will face in the future.
 This is similar to symptomatic treatment in many cases, but to not be limited to a temporary solution, the root of the problem must be found and that part disabled.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot because of the development of human science and technology, and the problem has become more serious because of the overpopulation and the luxurious lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted the Declaration on July 4, its president, John Hancock, and its secretary, Charles Thomson, sent the document to John Dunlap, a printer in Philadelphia, to be printed.
 During that night, 150 to 200 copies of what is now called the "Dunlap Broadside" were printed.
 On July 8, 1976, the document was first read aloud by President John Nixon in front of the Independence Hall.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 known extant Dunlap broadsides are the oldest surviving copies of this document; the handwritten original no longer exists.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived to the present day, and we call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because birds have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make birds look like dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws on their feet, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like a T. rex.
 Most computers in use today use a method of manipulating information called binary coding.
 Binary numbers can have only two values, either 0 or 1, and these numbers are called bits in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not have immediate symptoms. Symptoms like vomiting are so common that they can't be immediately diagnosed.
 The most obvious sign of a poisoning is a container of medication or household chemicals that has been left open.
 Check out the table for specific emergency first aid instructions for certain poisons.
 The term bug is a term entomologists use to refer to these types of insects.
 The term was coined from the parasitic insect, the bed bug, which has been known since ancient times.
 Both the bed bug and the cockroach are persistent pests, adapting to their hosts' habitats and residences.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS), the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults, affects an estimated 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS) is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and nerves.
 Women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis, a new study finds.
 The couple may decide that it is not in their best interest or the child's best interest to raise the baby.
 These couples may choose to adopt a baby.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary purpose of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides most scientific research.
 But experiments are about eliminating one or more hypotheses, asking questions, making observations, and leading to scientific discovery.
 Theologians and philosophers focused on the classical texts and especially the Latin Bible.
 In science, including psychology, Aristotle's view of all matter was accepted.
 As knowledge of Greek declined, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many of the rhythms observed in physiology and behavior are critically dependent on the existence of a biological clock and its production of a circadian cycle.
 For most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals, a rhythmic cycle is recorded, not simply a response to an external cycle signal.
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that can keep on ticking even when there are no signals coming from the outside.
 Hershey and Chase's experiment was one of the first to suggest that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages or viruses to insert the bacterial DNA into their own.
 They performed two experiments: one to identify DNA in the pahs when there was a radioactive cause, and another to identify proteins in the pahs when there was a radioactive cause.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected genetic segment, and whether the affected cells are germline cells.
 Only mutations in the germ line cells can be passed on to children, and mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism involves people who are interested in nature-based activities, such as hiking, birdwatching, and wildlife viewing.
 Examples of field activities include hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo's Orangutan Island, photos, and learning are just one example.
 Every morning, people leave their small rural towns in their cars to go to work, passing the other commuters who have just left their jobs.
 This dynamic transportation shuttle will connect and support everyone with a car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, scientific data shows that this carbon economy on a massive scale has pushed the biosphere out of the stable state that has helped human evolution for the last 20 million years.
 Everyone is involved in society, using the transport system, and almost everyone complains about the transport system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear similar complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transport systems cause such frustration, and why do they fail to deliver every day? Are transport engineers all incompetent? Or is something more fundamental at work?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles and their interactions with each other between two points.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flow because drivers' behavior cannot be predicted 100 percent.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range, so traffic flow has some reasonable consistency and can be roughly described mathematically.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three main characteristics were set up in relation to each other: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly. The ability to fly helped insects to escape enemies more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back.
 This gives them a wider range of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are moths and flies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people believed that he was right, including some who thought that the solar system (and other stars) revolved around the Earth, but many did not.
 It seems like the Earth is not moving, doesn't it?
 The Amazon is the second longest river in the world and the largest by volume. It carries more than eight times the water of the second longest river.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes reaching six miles wide.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the rivers of the world into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River mainstream is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long. The basin is fed by thousands of tributaries.
 Pyramid building continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, but in size and technical excellence it never surpassed the pyramids of the Fourth Dynasty.
 The ancient New Kingdom Egyptians were amazed by the monumental architecture of their ancestors, which was more than 1,000 years old by their standards.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, the smallest independent state in the world and the least populated country.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for legislative and official communications.
 Also, unlike Latin, which is used frequently in religious ceremonies, Italian is the everyday language spoken by most people working in the country.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholics.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, and copper since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in their natural form and can be mined with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 It was similar to the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas, and plasma (in that order), but Aristotle also theorized that they were made up of new substances that were changing into what we see.
 An alloy is basically a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are a lot of elements on the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, as are the metals gold and silver.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that a few thousand of them could fit inside the period at the end of this sentence.
 So, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, the advent of newer writing methods led to less use of the pencil, and it was pushed to a less important position.
 Now people don’t need to get close to a pencil sharpener to write messages on a computer screen.
 People are just wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is created.
 Nuclear fission bombs are based on the principle that a large amount of energy is required to bring together a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It's like pulling a heavy wagon up a hill. When you split the atom again, some of the energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they have a tendency to split on their own, with very little outside influence or no outside conditions at all.
 "The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and the outer layer of the moon is called the 'crust.'"
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the bottom.
 The crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 The crust is thinner, so there may be more maria near the surface, where it is easier for magma to rise to the surface.
 Content theory focuses on what causes people to do certain things or to be motivated to do them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs or desires that are internalized by the time they become adults.
 These theories look at certain people who make you want to do what you do and what in your environment makes you do certain things and not others.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 Generally, two behaviors can emerge as a manager begins to lead a former colleague: one end of the spectrum is to try to remain "one of the guys."
 Managers of this type make decisions that are not well received by people, take disciplinary action, assess performance and assign responsibility, and have difficulty holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, you have individuals who think that they have to change everything the team has been doing and make it their own.
 Ultimately, the team's success is the leader's responsibility.
 Such behavior causes confusion among the team leader and members.
 Virtual teams maintain the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real members.
 They often have more autonomy than the traditional team members because they can meet with their teams at a time that is convenient for them, which is not always understood by the local management team.
 The existence of a "true" "transparent team" (Lason and Lafferty, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team that each member reports to. This team sets the standards for each member.
 Why does it take so long for organizations to establish learning communities? One goal of putting the concept of organizational learning into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in the organization's business units, creativity and innovation can flourish.
 As a result, the process of overcoming obstacles together can lead to new innovative processes to meet the needs of customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create an innovation culture as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) describes a Continuum approach to helping organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provides the necessary material evidence when taking a theoretical approach to the study of cognitive abilities. It narrows down the field of study and makes it more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior helps scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, lesions, tumors, and other conditions can affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies has allowed us to observe and investigate brain structure and function in ways that were previously impossible.
 This provides a lot of information and data to create a simulation model that helps us understand the inner workings of the mind.
 AI conjures up visions of science fiction, but it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes work that automates tasks requiring intelligent behavior.
 For example, it includes handwriting, voice, face recognition, as well as control, planning, scheduling and customer diagnostics and answering questions.
 These have become separate disciplines that focus on providing solutions to problems that occur in real life.
 AI systems are now being used frequently in the economic, medical, engineering and military fields, as seen in many home computers and video game software.
 Field trips are a big part of every classroom. Generally, teachers want to take their students to places that don't require a bus trip.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, where students can see museum exhibits, visit an aquarium, or view beautiful works of art from the comfort of their classroom.
 Virtual field trips are a great way to look back on field trips and share your experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year Bennett School students in North Carolina design a website about a trip to the state capital, and each year the website is redesigned, and the previous version is left online as a scrapbook.
 Blogging also helps students improve their writing. Students often start blogs with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers usually changes that.
 Since most students are the most critical audience, bloggers begin to try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 "Blogs also make students more literate and interesting through the need to attract an audience (Totoro, 2004)."
 Blogging encourages cooperation and helps students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "The proper use of blogs is to "actively respond to Internet resources to promote analytical and critical thinking among students and allow students to define their own position in the writings of others and establish their own views on certain topics (Oravec, 2020)."
 Ottawa is Canada's charming capital city, where the use of two languages is a source of national pride, and its diverse art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 In the south, there is Niagara Falls, and in the north, the untouched natural beauty of Muskoka.
 All of this makes Ontario stand out as the true Canada to outsiders.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: There are more African Americans living in the United States than there are Canadians.
 The islands of East Africa lie along the coast of East Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent or associated with France, and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Islam was also brought by the Arabs, and there was a great change in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonization began in the 15th century, with the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovering the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 The north is bordered by the Sahel, the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Female: All female travelers are encouraged to answer married, regardless of actual marital status.
 Wearing a ring can help too (but expensive rings are best avoided).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can result in what would be considered harassment in their home country and that it is not uncommon for men to touch women, for example, by holding their arms.
 Don't be afraid to firmly reject men and stand your ground (cultural differences or not, harassment is not to be tolerated!).
 Modern-day Casablanca was founded in the 10th century BC by Berber fishermen, and later became a strategic port for the Phoenicians, Romans, and Carthaginians.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca, but after the 1755 earthquake they abandoned it.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish traders who settled here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old medina, it is easy to find places selling traditional Moroccan products such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and a variety of other things, but all of them are for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, particularly the town's roads.
 Goma is quite safe, but if you are visiting Goma from outside, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in North Kivu province.
 The city is also a base for the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking in Africa and climbing of Nyiragongo volcano.
 You can get around Goma by motorcycle taxi (boda-boda). The normal (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combining the meaning of "impossible to reach", "Timbuktu" became a metaphor for a faraway, exotic place.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor village, but it has become a tourist attraction because of its fame and has an airport.
 Due to the effects of desert sand, Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites in 1990.
 It was one of the most important expeditions in Henry Louis Gates' PBS special "African Odyssey."
 The city is more Arabic than African, in contrast to other cities in Mali.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and is bordered to the east by Mozambique, to the north by Zimbabwe and to the south by the Crocodile River.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different zones, each supporting different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's premier attractions and the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, there is a conservation fee and entrance fee to the park.
 It may be beneficial to purchase a wild card that allows entry to a specific park or the entirety of South Africa's national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the place where the name Hong Kong was given to the territory and is the main focus of many tourists.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is likened to a sparkling bar graph because of the way the buildings line up along the Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views of Hong Kong, head to the Kowloon waterfront on the opposite side of the island.
 Most of Hong Kong's land reclamation has been concentrated along the north coast.
 This is where British colonial developers made their mark, so if you're looking for evidence of the former colony, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove belt, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast to the backwaters of Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO World Heritage Site and a part of the Indian territory within the forest is called Sundarbans National Park.
 This forest is not just a simple mangrove swamp. It is part of the last remnants of the great jungle that once covered the Gangetic Plain.
 The Sundarbans covers an area of 3,850 km² and about one-third of it is covered by water and marshy land.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans is a wildlife sanctuary. It is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area today.
 Buses run all day from the inter-city bus station (across the river), but buses to the east and to Jakarta/Batam only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 The buses are often full, so it is best to buy a ticket in advance.
 In most areas, comfortable and sturdy minibus coaches are used.
 Shared taxis are a quick and easy way to travel to nearby areas, such as Nu 150 for Paro and Nu 200 for Punakha.
 The bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River and connects the Brazilian city of Oiapoque with Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 m (272 ft) high, the bridge is 378 m (1,240 ft) long, and has two 3.50 m (11 ft) wide lanes.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters, and construction was completed in August 2011, with the bridge closed to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the construction of the Brazilian customs inspection station is completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay, and were semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous groups, such as the Guaikuru and the Payaagu, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, known as the "Land of the Guarani", was born in the 16th century as a result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish began a three-century-long colonial period.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has maintained a considerable degree of indigenous characteristics and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Grounds in Las Canitas.
 It is also possible to watch smaller tournaments and matches here at other times of the year.
 For tournament news and ticket information for polo matches, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland pound (FKP), which is fixed at a value of one British pound (GBP).
 You can exchange money at the island's only bank, located just across the street from the FIC West store.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands, and the Stanley credit card and the US dollar are also widely accepted.
 In the affected area, UK and US currencies are accepted, but credit cards are not. You should check with the owner beforehand to find out what forms of payment are accepted.
 It is almost impossible to change the Falkland Islands pound outside the islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Montevideo is located on the southern edge of the equator, so when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is a subtropical city, with temperatures usually above 30°C in summer.
 Winters can be bitterly cold, though temperatures rarely fall below -20 °C (-4 °F). The wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than the actual temperature.
 There is no "rainy season" or "dry season" as such, and rainfall is fairly evenly distributed throughout the year.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing humans, but they are still wild animals and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Park officials say you must be at least 100 yards/meters from bears and wolves, and at least 25 yards/meters from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may appear, bulls, elk, moose, bears, and almost all large animals can be aggressive.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured by not keeping a proper distance from these animals, which are large, wild, and dangerous.
 Additionally, smells can attract bears and other wildlife, so you should avoid cooking or carrying smelly foods and keep your campsite clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is on the island of Upolu and has a population of just over 40,000.
 Apia was established in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British ships sank, killing about 200 Americans and Germans.
 During the period of the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, a peaceful meeting in the village resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Because Auckland is bisected by two harbours, there is a lot of coastline. The most popular areas are in three regions.
 North Shore Beach (North Harbour District) is on the Pacific Ocean, stretching from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It has almost all sandy beaches that are safe for swimming, and most of the beaches are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive is on the Waitemata Harbour, in the suburb of St Heliers, between Mission Bay and the central city of Auckland.
 These beaches are usually family-oriented and uncrowded, and there are a variety of shops along the waterfront. It is safe to swim here.
 The main local beer is Number One, which is not complex but a refreshing, easy-drinking beer. Another local beer is Manta.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easily available.
 Local tap water is safe to drink, but if you are concerned, you can easily buy bottled water.
 The concept of 'flat white' is foreign to Australians, who have short blacks as 'espressos', cappuccinos served with a thick layer of cream (not foam) and tea served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juice is expensive but very tasty.
 Many trips are made to this reef area throughout the year, but injuries from these causes are rare on the reef.
 Still, you should listen to the advice of the staff and be careful to follow all the signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish occur from October to April, near the coast and in estuaries, and are occasionally found in the open ocean.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people. Most sharks are afraid of people and swim away.
 The sea anaconda does not live in the sea, but in the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 By booking in advance, travelers have a sense of security that there will be a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents often have special offers on certain hotels, but you can also book other types of accommodation, such as camping sites, through them.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport pickup/transfers, and a sightseeing tour.
 We may also need to hold a booking for you if we need time to make a decision or to obtain other documentation (e.g. visas) for your destination.
 However, if you have any modifications or requests, please do not contact the hotel directly, but first contact your travel agency.
 At some festivals, many people who attend the music festival decide to camp on the spot, and most of the attendees think that camping is something that must be experienced.
 To be close to the fun and excitement, you should get there early and get a campsite close to the music.
 Although the main stage may be over, don’t forget that music can be played until late into the night at various locations around the festival.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 When crossing the North Sea in winter, the ship will pass through ice, and the noise can be quite horrible, so it is a good idea to check the location of the cabin.
 The St. Petersburg cruise includes time in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (see terms and conditions).
 Casinos usually make a lot of effort to maximize the time and money spent by their guests. They usually have no windows and clocks, and it can be hard to find the exit.
 They always have special food, drinks, and entertainment to keep visitors coming back and to keep the good vibes going.
 Some places even offer free drinks. But because alcohol impairs judgment, good gamblers know the importance of not getting drunk.
 When driving over high altitudes or mountain roads, you should consider the possibility of snow, ice, or freezing temperatures.
 On icy, snow-covered roads, friction is reduced, so you can't drive as well as you would on a smooth asphalt road.
 When the snowstorm comes, a lot of snow can fall in a short time, and your feet can get stuck.
 It can also be limited by falling or blowing snow, raindrops, or ice on the vehicle windows.
 In contrast, many countries have roads that are daily used on ice or snow, and are not blocked for most of the year.
 The safari is probably the most spectacular tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari, which is widely known, refers to a land journey, especially in the savannahs of Africa, to see the wild animals.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach vehicles closely and can be observed well with standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs, and leopards are sometimes shy, so binoculars can help you see them better.
 "Hiking safari ("Bushwalking", "Hiking safari" or "Walking safari") is a form of hiking that consists of several hours or days of walking."
 The Paralympic Games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in multiple locations across Japan.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 Summer Olympics, will be the only city to have hosted the Summer Games twice in Asia.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may be in a bit of a pickle.
 Refund policies vary, but as of late March, most coronavirus-related cancellation policies do not extend beyond July 2020, the Olympics.
 Most event tickets are priced between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, and the average ticket price is around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels have ironing boards and irons available for rent, even if they are not provided in the room.
 You may not like to iron or wear ironed socks. In this case, you can use a hair dryer.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (it may shrink or discolor).
 There are other ways to purify water, some of which are more effective for certain hazards.
 In some areas, a minute of boiling is enough, in others it may take several minutes.
 Water filters vary in effectiveness, and if water quality is a concern, it is recommended to purchase bottled water from a reputable brand.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not common in their own region.
 Pests can make food go bad, cause inflammation or, worse, cause an allergic reaction, spread poison or spread disease.
 The disease itself, or the risk of injury or death from an animal, is not usually considered a pest.
 Duty-free shopping is an opportunity to purchase goods that are exempt from taxes and consumption taxes in certain areas.
 Travelers from countries with high taxes can sometimes save a significant amount of money, especially when buying alcohol or cigarettes.
 The road between Point Marion and Fairmont, located in a remote mountainous area, is known as one of the most difficult roads to drive on the entirety of the Pennsylvania Turnpike.
 If you are not used to driving in the countryside, beware of steep hills, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than on previous and subsequent stretches - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and speed compliance is much more important in this stretch than in others.
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route, such as at Wise, Virginia.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to their southern neighbors, Austria, with a lot of butter and variety.
 Fruit pastries are common, with apples being used in pastries all year round, and cherries and plums being used in summer.
 Many of Germany's baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes are especially good with strong coffee.
 If you want a small, flavorful loaf, try this bread, called a berliner, pfannkuchen, or krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a dish made with spices and herbs, usually with meat or vegetables.
 "Curry can be ""thick"" or ""thin"" depending on the amount of water used."
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries. In the southern Indian coastal regions and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian food is a catch-all term for the diverse regional cuisines of the country's 17,000 islands.
 However, when used without restriction, the term tends to refer to the food of the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, the Javanese cuisine is characterized by a variety of simple dishes, and the main flavors favored by Javanese are peanut, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar), and various spices.
 The saddle is a seat for a rider on top of a horse.
 This device gives the rider a lot more stability, but it can be a safety issue because the foot can get caught.
 If a rider falls off a horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, the horse may run away, and the rider may be dragged along. There are several safety precautions that can be taken to minimize this risk.
 First, most riders wear a saddle and wear a narrow, tight-fitting riding boot.
 Next, some saddles, particularly those in the UK, have a safety bar that can be pulled back to prevent the rider from falling backwards.
 Cochamó Valley - The best climbing area in Chile, known as the Yosemite Valley of South America, with huge granite walls and rocky peaks.
 The mountain tops have breathtaking views of the surrounding mountains. Climbers from all over the world come to explore the infinite potential of nature.
 Snow sports including skiing and snowboarding are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard attached to your feet.
 "Skiing is a form of recreation in which skiers travel down snow-covered hills or mountains using skis and boots.
 The idea of skiing is very old. Cave paintings depicting skiers date back to 5,000 BC.
 As a sport, downhill skiing dates back at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club was founded in 1861 by Norwegians in Australia.
 Skiing backpacking: This activity is also known as backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually does not include it, and in the latter case is done on steep terrain and requires much harder skis and boots.
 Think of ski runs as similar to hiking trails.
 In good conditions you can go a little further than walking, but you will not be able to reach cross-country skiing speeds without a well-maintained track and without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small but many independent countries, and usually traveling between them means going through visa applications and passport checks several times.
 But the Schengen zone functions somewhat like a country in this regard.
 While in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, with a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa individually in each Schengen country, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of antiques. In some countries, products that are over 100 years old are classified as antiques.
 North America has a geographical difference that is shorter than Europe in terms of the age at which it is defined as antiques.
 Handmade products may not be as durable as mass-produced similar products, but they can still be defined as antiques.
 Reindeer herding is one of the Sami's main means of livelihood, and in trade, this culture is also important to other traders.
 Although not all Sámi have traditionally been involved in large-scale reindeer herding, most have relied on reindeer as draft animals, and have supplemented their diet with fishing and hunting.
 Today, many Sami work in modern industries. Tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sápmi.
 Especially in the non-Romani community, it is widely used, but the word "gypsy" is often considered offensive because of the negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Romani people.
 If the country you are visiting becomes a travel warning area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You may want to hear the government’s opinion rather than your own, but the advice of governments is tailored to their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alert is just a brief summary of a country's political situation.
 The views presented are mainly superficial, general, and oversimplified, to be compared with more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any dangerous weather condition that can cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types depending on the local, topographical and atmospheric conditions.
 Gales, hail, excessive precipitation, and wildfires are forms and effects of adverse weather, such as thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts, and cyclones.
 Local and seasonal adverse weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, sleet, and hail.
 Travelers should look up the local weather beforehand to avoid any hiccups in their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country considered a combat zone should be sure to receive professional training.
 An Internet search for 'hostile environment courses' will probably give you a local company address.
 The lectures usually cover much more detail on all the issues discussed here, and are usually accompanied by practical experience.
 The course usually lasts 2-5 days and involves role-playing, first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about wildlife survival are common, but there are few publications about war zones.
 Travelers who are planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documentation when they return.
 Whether to issue passports with a gender-neutral X, or to allow people to change their documents to reflect their preferred name and gender, varies from country to country.
 The willingness to accept such documents from foreign governments is also very diverse.
 In the post-9/11 era, security screening has become even more of a hassle.
 Transgender people before surgery should not expect to pass the scanner because their privacy and dignity will be violated.
 Rip currents are ocean currents that return from breaking waves that often hit reefs or other similar structures on the beach.
 Due to the systematic classification underwater, the redox potential is concentrated in some deep places, and this can form from rapid currents to deep water.
 Most of them die from exhaustion after trying to swim against the current, which is often impossible.
 If you can get out of the current, it's not that hard to swim back to shore.
 You may want to try to find a place where you won't be caught in the current again, or you may want to wait for a rescue, depending on your swimming ability or whether you were found by someone else.
 Culture shock happens faster than culture shock because there is no honeymoon phase, and it can last longer and be more intense.
 Travelers who have no trouble adapting to new cultures often have a hard time re-adapting to their own culture when they return home.
 When returning home after living abroad, they may lose some of their cultural habits while adapting to the culture of their home country.
 When you first went abroad, most people were patient and understanding because they knew you had to adjust to a new country.
 People may not think that travelers on their way home need patience and understanding.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see the pyramids in silence before the show starts.
 You will always hear the sounds of tourists and vendors. The story of light and sound is like a storybook.
 The Sphinx is set as the background and narrator of the long story.
 The scenes were projected onto the pyramids and the other pyramids were lit up.
 Discovered in 1819, the South Shetland Islands are claimed by several countries and in 2020, 16 countries are active, with the most bases.
 The islands are located about 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula, the largest of which is King George Island, where the Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Other islands include Livingston and Disappointment Islands, which are still volcanic in origin and provide a natural harbour with full of water, caldera.
 Ellesmere Island is located in the southern part of the peninsula and is bordered by the Belingsea Strait.
 Here the land rises into the highlands, then recedes again to form a 360-kilometer-long belt of the Elysian Mountains, which is bisected by the Minnesota glaciers.
 In the north or the Centennial Mountains, you'll find the highest mountain in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which is 4,892 m (16,050 ft) high.
 If you are in a remote area where your cell phone does not have coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones are not usually a replacement for cell phones because they must be used in an area where a satellite and a transceiver are in direct line of sight.
 The service is often used in maritime transportation, including ferries, and where voice and data services are required.
 More information about this service can be obtained from your local telecommunications service provider.
 More and more people are using Gap Year to travel and study.
 This is especially popular with graduates, as it allows you to take a year out of your studies without it being a huge burden on your studies.
 In most cases, enrolling in a gap-year course abroad can actually increase your chances of getting into higher education back home.
 Generally, there is a fee to enroll in these training programs.
 "Finland is a great place to go boating. "The Land of a thousand lakes" has thousands of islands in its lakes and coastal archipelago."
 In the archipelago and lakes, you don't need a yacht.
 Although the coastal islands and large lakes are large enough for any yacht, it is also a great experience to take a small boat or even a kayak.
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with one boat per seven to eight people.
 This is similar to what has happened in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is quite unusual in other countries (New Zealand has one death for every 40 people).
 Certainly most Baltic Sea cruises offer a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can spend a couple of days exploring the historic city and then return to the cruise ship for a night's sleep.
 If you go to the coast by sea, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruise lines include a stop in Berlin, Germany, in their brochures, but as you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be a scary experience for anyone, but especially for those who have never been on a plane or are afraid of flying.
 This is nothing to be ashamed of, and is no different from the personal fears, disgusts, and prejudices that most people have about other things.
 For some, understanding how an aircraft works and what happens during a flight can help overcome fears based on ignorance or a lack of control.
 The courier company receives a lot of money for delivering the goods quickly. Often, the time is very important for business documents, urgent repairs or spare parts.
 Large companies use their own aircraft on some routes, but for other routes or small companies, there is a problem.
 If you are shipping by air freight, you may have to wait a few days to clear customs in some routes.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage, which airline regulations do not allow without a passenger on board.
 The only sure way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money (or have your company pay for you).
 So it's not cheap, but it can be. It can cost up to 11 times the price of a business class ticket or first class ticket!
 Generally, a direct flight from Area A to Area B is not worth the effort to find a discounted seat, whether it is in business or first class.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The language is Romanian, but Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic strife.
 The 1994 conflict created the Transnistria Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Although political negotiations between the two Moldovas failed, economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Eastern Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million and is the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 Once an ancient city, Smirna is now a modern, developed commercial center surrounded by mountains and a huge bay.
 The city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey, but amidst the wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, and modern shopping centers are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets, and old mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can see the nearby island of Eysturoy, and there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard are some interesting marble carvings of doves on some of the tombs.
 It's worth spending 30 minutes to walk around this interesting town.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting town of Sintra, a city famous with foreigners for its magnificence, which Byron praised.
 Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, to the north is the world-famous Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima.
 Remember that this is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great significance to a large part of the world's population, which is almost impossible to count.
 There are still many people here who survived, many more who were killed here, or who died here in the labour camps, whether they were Jewish or not.
 Please show respect for this place, its dignity and solemnity. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not scratch or deface the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the population prefers to use Catalan, while the majority understands it and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are in Catalan, which is the official language established by law.
 However, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 Although the regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, in the event of an unforeseen disruption, the automatic system will broadcast in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 "This is usually a false stereotype, but the best way to be well received in Paris is still to behave like a ""bien élevé"" person. This will make your life easier."
 The Parisians' brusque exterior will quickly disappear if you show them basic courtesy.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is mostly covered by dense forests of beech, hornbeam, pine, and alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 The wide range of climates, different soils and altitudes result in a wide range of plant communities.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, rare animals such as the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, saola, serow, and many more common species are found together.
 During a visit to the monastery, women must wear a skirt that covers their knees and must cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries will provide a covering to cover up for women visitors who have not brought their own, but especially if you bring a brightly colored covering, you will be greeted with a smile at the entrance by the monks or nuns.
 Along the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 You can rent them at the entrance, but since they are not washed after each use, you may find it uncomfortable to wear these kimonos. One size fits all men!
 Like the food of the Mediterranean region, the food of Mallorca is based on bread, vegetables, meat (especially pork), and olive oil.
 A simple, yet particularly popular evening meal is the pâté en croûte, a bread roll stuffed with easy-to-find ingredients such as cheese or tuna, and topped with tomato and olive oil.
 All nouns that are used with the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish some verbs and nouns.
 It is a bit complicated to determine whether a verb or adjective is used in the predicate position, but it is certainly easier to read.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main problematic letters are c and g, because they change depending on the following vowel.
 You also need to distinguish between r and rr. Caro means dear, but carro means cart.
 Persian has a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar primer will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and understand the phrases better.
 Of course, if you know romance languages, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is too similar to Spanish to require separate study.
 Pre-modern observatories are usually obsolete today and are used as museums or educational sites.
 Because light pollution was not as bad as it is today, they were located in places that were easily accessible, such as cities and campuses, unlike today's observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The cherry blossom viewing event, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 This concept originated in China, where the plum blossom was chosen as a symbol of culture.
 The first cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace, and only the Emperor and the members of the aristocracy attended.
 "Plants look so good in their natural environment that the temptation is to take just one sample."
 "Formal gardens are visited for 'samples' and are then driven out, needless to say."
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, getting around is very convenient, and you can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 "But if you are in the ""hot"" zone, a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to deal with high temperatures (always high) and strong sunshine (rarely clear)."
 There are also buses to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure that the bus you want to take is going to Kiriat Arba, the Jewish village near Hebron, and not to Hebron itself.
 Inland waterways can be a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Rhine and Rhone valleys, take a cruise on the Danube to an interesting place, or take a boat trip along the Seine.
 They are also setting up popular hiking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the holidays surrounding Christmas have become universal to non-Christian and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter Eve to watch the sunrise.
 Of course there is a Christian theological explanation for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and harvest ritual.
 More traditional churches hold Easter Vigils on Saturday nights of Holy Week, where the faithful often celebrate the Resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that first arrived on the island arrived on the island either swimming, flying, or floating.
 Mammals could not travel as far as the continents, like the giant tortoises that are the primary grazers of the Galapagos.
 Since humans arrived on the Galapagos, many mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs, have been introduced to the islands.
 If you visit the polar regions in winter, you will experience polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 The sky is dark all day, so it is a good opportunity to see the aurora.
 Since the area is sparsely populated, light pollution is not a problem, so you can enjoy the stars in the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more formal and hierarchical than that of Westerners.
 Business attire is the standard, and colleagues refer to each other by first name or title.
 In the workplace, teamwork is very important, so the collective effort is emphasized over individual achievement.
 Workers must obtain the approval of their superiors for any decision they make and must follow their instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.2973424659568038, 'precisions': [0.6376343183344526, 0.36941083640189376, 0.23954128440366973, 0.16105445449297673], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9630488822132125, 'length_ratio': 0.9637150600703855, 'translation_length': 23824, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.451509166491, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}